Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-304
Reorganization; council; members; qualifications.

After the terms of members of the city council in office at the time of reorganization as a city of the second class shall have expired, the city council shall consist of not less than four nor more than twelve citizens of such city, who shall be qualified electors under the Constitution and laws of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1933, c. 112, § 4, p. 454;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-165;

R.S.1943, § 17-304;

Laws 1973, LB 559, § 7;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 98.
August 24, 2017
This section provides the number and qualification of members of city council after expiration of terms of incumbents, where first-class city becomes second-class city through decrease in population. State ex rel. Cashman v. Carmean, 138 Neb. 819, 295 N.W. 801 (1941).